de: Stift-/Filzstift-Design: Deutlich; Fein; Medium; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 笔尖/毡尖设计: 粗的; 细; 媒介; 其他
nl: Ontwerp pen/viltstift: Vetgedrukt; Fijn; Medium; Andere
pl: Konstrukcja końcówki długopisu/filcowej: Pogrubiony; Dobre; Środek; Inne
nb: Penn-/felttuppdesign: Fet; Tynn; Middels; Annet
sl-SI: Dizajn konice kemičnega svinčnika/flomastra: Krepko; Fino; Srednja; Drugo
sk-SK: Dizajn pera/plsti: Tučný; Jemný; Stredný; Iné
sv: Design på penna/filtpenna: Fetstil; Fint; Medium; Övrigt
lt-LT: Rašiklio / flomasterio galiuko dizainas: Paryškintas; Smulkus; Vidutinis; Kita
ru: Конструкция наконечника ручки/фломастера: Толстый; Тонкий; Средний; Другой
cs: Design plstěného hrotu: Tlustá; Jemný; Médium; Jiné
ko: 펜/펠트 팁 디자인: 볼드; 파인; 매체; 기타
tr: Kalem/Keçe uçlu tasarımı: Kalın; İnce; Orta; Diğer
es: Diseño de la punta del rotulador/fieltro: Negrita; Fino; Medio; Otros
pt-PT: Design do bico de caneta/caneta de feltro: Negrito; Fina; Médio; Outro
hr-HR: Oblik vrha kemijske olovke / flomastera: Debeli; Tanki; Srednji; Ostalo
el: Σχεδιασμός μύτης στυλό/μαρκαδόρου: Έντονη; Λεπτές; Μέση; Άλλο
vi: Thiết kế bút mực/bút dạ: Đậm; Mảnh; Vừa; Khác
en: Pen/Felt tip design: Bold; Fine; Medium; Other
it: Design a penna/punta in feltro: Grassetto; Fine; Medio; Altro
ja: ペン/フェルトチップデザイン: ボールド; ファイン; 媒体; その他
da: Pen-/filtspidsdesign: Fremhævet; Fin; Medium; Andet
ro-RO: Design vârf stilou/fetru: Gros; Subțire; Mediu; Altele
th: การออกแบบส่วนปลายปากกา/ปากกาเมจิค: หนา; บาง; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
fi: Kynän/huopakärkikynän muotoilu: Lihavoitu; Ohut; Keskimääräinen; Muu
fr: Conception de la pointe du feutre/stylo: Épaisse; Fin; Moyen; Autre
bg-BG: Дизайн на филцов връх/писалка: Удебелен; Фин; Среден; Други
zh-TW: 筆/氈尖設計: 粗; 細; 媒介; 其他
hu: Toll-/filctollhegy kialakítása: Vastag; Vékony; Középvastag; Egyéb
pt-BR: Design de caneta/ponta de feltro: Negrito; Ralo; Médio; Outro